Hawaii statutes.
[§514B-126] Board meetings; minutes. (a) Minutes of
meetings of the board shall include the recorded vote of each board member on
all motions except motions voted on in executive session.

(b) Minutes of meetings of the board shall be
approved no later than the second succeeding regular meeting.

(c) Minutes of all meetings of the board shall
be available within seven calendar days after approval, and unapproved final
drafts of the minutes of a meeting shall be available within sixty days after
the meeting; provided that the minutes of any executive session may be withheld
if their publication would defeat the lawful purpose of the executive session. [L 2004, c 164, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next